Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-609.01
Board of directors; statement of public policy.

Because of the importance of electrical energy to the present and future development of the state, the effect of the operations of public power districts on both its citizens and economy, and the significant impact of the action or inaction of a public power district not only on its direct and indirect residential ratepayers but also on the population and economy of areas in proximity to the immediate area served, it is hereby declared to be the public policy of this state to provide for and encourage a broad base representation of the citizens of this state on the boards of directors of public power districts.

Laws 1986, LB 949, § 1.